District of Columbia statutes.
3-2938

Repealed

Money paid to Director of Department of Finance and Revenue; deposits; payment of expenses; compensation of members of boards and employees of Commission

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(e), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1301 to 2-1343.